Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2503
Commission; legal entity; executive director; qualifications; office.

The commission shall be a legal entity with the power to receive and administer funds from state, federal, tribal, and other sources, and to employ and fix the compensation of an executive director of its own choosing who shall be an enrolled member of a Nebraska tribe or a legal resident of the State of Nebraska of Indian descent. An office for the executive director shall be provided.

Laws 1971, LB 904, § 3;

Laws 1976, LB 986, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1216.